Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-412 Protective arrangements and
single transactions. (a) If a basis is established for a protective order
with respect to an individual, the court, without appointing a conservator,
may:

(1) Authorize, direct, or ratify any transaction
necessary or desirable to achieve any arrangement for security, service, or
care meeting the foreseeable needs of the protected person, including:

(A) Payment, delivery, deposit, or retention
of funds or property;

(B) Sale, mortgage, lease, or other transfer of
property;

(C) Purchase of an annuity;

(D) Making a contract for life care, deposit
contract, or contract for training and education; or

(E) Addition to or establishment of a suitable
trust, including a trust created under chapter 554B; and

(2) Authorize, direct, or ratify any other contract,
trust, will, or transaction relating to the protected person's property and
business affairs, including a settlement of a claim, upon determining that it
is in the best interest of the protected person.

(b) In deciding whether to approve a
protective arrangement or other transaction under this section, the court shall
consider the factors described in section 560:5-411(c).

(c) The court may appoint a special
conservator to assist in the accomplishment of any protective arrangement or
other transaction authorized under this section. The special conservator shall
have the authority conferred by the order and shall serve until discharged by
order after reporting to the court. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next